Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.180

Records of persons receiving fruit.

Any person receiving commercial tree fruits from any producer thereof or any producer of tree fruit who prepared or processed his or her own tree fruit for sale, or shipment for sale shall keep complete and accurate records of all such tree fruit. Such records shall meet the requirements of rules or regulations prescribed by the commission and shall be kept for two years subject to inspection by duly authorized representatives of the commission.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6032; 1969 c 129 s 18.]